Maryland, session 2025, SB0966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–603.
(a) The Department shall cause to be published notice of applications for permits.
(b) The Department shall assure that applications for permits shall be available
to the public for inspection and copying.
(c) (1) (I) [Upon] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ON written request made within 10 working days after publication of a
notice of application, or in its own discretion, the Department shall provide an opportunity
for an informational meeting with respect to the application.
[(2)] (II) The informational meeting may be canceled if all persons who
made timely written requests withdraw the requests prior to the meeting.
(2) (I) IF AN APPLICATION IS FOR AN AIR QUALITY CONTROL
PERMIT UNDER § 2–404 OF THIS ARTICLE FOR AN ACTIVITY LOCATED IN HOWARD
COUNTY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE FOR AN INFORMATIONAL MEETING
WITH RESPECT TO THE APPLICATION.
(II) THE INFORMATIONAL MEETING MAY BE CANCELED IF THE
MEMBERS OF THE HOWARD COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
REQUEST THAT THE INFORMATIONAL MEETING NOT BE HELD.
(3) Unless the notice of application contained a notice of the informational
meeting, the Department shall publish notice of the informational meeting.
(d) (1) The Department may require the applicant to attend an informational
meeting or public hearing and present information concerning the application.

SENATE BILL 966 3
(2) If the applicant fails to appear and present information after a request
from the Department, the application may be denied.
2–404.
(a) This section applies to the following activities:
(1) Construction of a new source;
(2) Replacement of components of an existing permitted source, if the fixed
capital cost of the replacement components exceeds one–half of the fixed capital cost that
would be required to construct a new source comparable in process to the existing source;
and
(3) Modification of an existing permitted source by making a physical or
operational change to the source that will result in a significant net increase in emissions
of any pollutant from that source.
(b) (1) [Before] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEFORE accepting an application for a permit subject to subsection (c) of this section, the
Department shall require the applicant to submit documentation:
(i) That demonstrates that the proposal has been approved by the
local jurisdiction for all zoning and land use requirements; or
(ii) That the source meets all applicable zoning and land use
requirements.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to any application for a
permit to construct at an existing source unless the existing source is a nonconforming use.
(3) IF THE DEPARTMENT OR AN APPLICANT REQUESTS THAT
HOWARD COUNTY PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION OR VERIFICATION THAT A PROPOSAL
OR SOURCE SATISFIES ALL ZONING AND LAND USE REQUIREMENTS, BEFORE
PROVIDING THE DOCUMENTATION OR VERIFICATION, THE COUNTY SHALL
PUBLICIZE AND HOLD A PUBLIC MEETING WHERE INTERESTED PARTIES AND
CITIZENS HAVE THE OPPORTUNITY TO PROVIDE TESTIMONY.
(c) The Department shall comply with the provisions in subsection (d) of this
section before issuing a permit for the activities listed in subsection (a) of this section at:
(1) Any source which is required to obtain a permit to operate under
regulations adopted under this subtitle;

SENATE BILL 966
(2) Any source which is subject to federal standards under 40 C.F.R. Part
61 (National Emission Standards for Hazardous Air Pollutants) or 40 C.F.R. 52.21
(Prevention of Significant Deterioration); or
(3) Any source that will, after control, discharge 25 tons or more per year
of a pollutant regulated under this title in the areas of Baltimore City designated by the
United States Post Office as zip code numbers 21225, 21226, and 21230.
(d) (1) On receipt of an application for a permit subject to subsection (c) of this
section, the Department shall give notice immediately or require the applicant to give
notice immediately of the application to:
(i) The governing body of each county or municipal corporation in
which any portion of the source is located or is proposed to be located;
(ii) The governing body of each county or municipal corporation
within one mile of the property line of the source or the proposed location of the source;
(iii) Each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
a county in which any portion of the source is located or proposed to be located; and
(iv) Each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
each county within one mile of the property line of the source or the proposed location of
the source.
(2) In addition to the requirements under paragraph (1) of this subsection,
before issuing a permit subject to subsection (c) of this section, the Department shall:
(i) Comply with the provisions of Title 1, Subtitle 6 of this article;
and
(ii) Conduct any public hearing required by Title 1, Subtitle 6 of this
article.
(3) In addition to the requirements under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this
subsection, before issuing a permit to construct a source described in subsection (c)(3) of
this section, the Department shall require at the expense of the applicant the preparation
of an ambient air quality impact analysis regarding the proposed construction.
(e) Before issuing a permit for the activities listed in subsection (a) of this section
at any source which is subject to federal standards under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 (New Source
Performance Standards), the Department shall:
(1) Comply with the provisions of subsection (d) of this section; or
(2) (i) Electronically post a notice of an application for the permit on
the Department’s website in accordance with § 1–602(b)(1) of this article;

SENATE BILL 966 5
(ii) Give notice to the chief executive of any county or municipal
corporation in which any portion of the source is located or is proposed to be located; and
(iii) Receive comments from the public on the permit application.
(f) The provisions of this section do not apply to any permit to construct control
equipment on an existing source or to any permit to operate.
2–407.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THAT AUTHORIZES ACTIVITIES LOCATED IN HOWARD
COUNTY.
(B) IF THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT IS ENGAGED IN AN ACTIVITY
AUTHORIZED BY THE PERMIT WITHIN 1 MILE OF A PROPERTY THAT IS ZONED FOR
RESIDENTIAL USE AND THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT PREVIOUSLY OWNED THE
PROPERTY, THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT SHALL PROVIDE ANNUAL EMISSIONS
REPORTS TO ANY COMMUNITY ASSOCIATIONS THAT REPRESENT THE OWNERS OF
THE PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–315.
(a) The governing body of Howard County may grant, by law, a property tax credit
under this section against the county property tax imposed on:
(5) subject to subsection (b) of this section, owner–occupied residential real
property that is jointly owned by an individual and the Howard County Housing
Commission; [and]
(6) subject to subsection (b) of this section, residential or commercial real
property that has suffered damage caused by a natural disaster; AND
(7) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN
ONE–HALF MILE OF A SITE FOR WHICH A PERMIT OR REGISTRATION REQUIRED
UNDER § 2–401 OR § 2–404 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE HAS BEEN ISSUED.

SENATE BILL 966
(b) In establishing a tax credit under subsection (a)(3) through [(6)] (7) of this
section, the governing body of Howard County:
(1) shall develop criteria necessary to implement the credit;
(2) shall designate an agency to administer the credit; and
(3) may specify:
(i) the amount and duration of the credit;
(ii) the qualifications and application procedures for the credit; and
(iii) any other requirement or procedure for the granting or
administration of the credit that the governing body considers appropriate.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2026,
the Howard County Executive and County Council of Howard County shall report to the
members of the Howard County Delegation to the General Assembly, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
(1) the county’s authority to adopt ambient air quality standards that are
more restrictive than the standards set under State law or by the Department of the
Environment; and
(2) a plan on how the county could implement ambient air quality
standards that are more restrictive than the standards set under State law or by the
Department of the Environment.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.